Utah statutes.
9-7-405.   Rules -- Use of library.
(1)  The library board of directors shall make, amend, and repeal rules, not
inconsistent with law, for the governing of the library.
(2)  Each library established under this part shall be free to the use of the
inhabitants of the city where located, subject to the rules adopted by the
board.  The board may exclude from the use of the library any person who
willfully violates these rules.  The board may extend the privileges and use
of the library to persons residing outside of the city upon terms and
conditions it may prescribe by rule.
